Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 10
MANUFACTURING CAREER PATHWAY

23-60-1001. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Manufacturing plays a vital role in Colorado's economy;

The manufacturing sector in Colorado is diverse, with employers distributed across the state;

Over five thousand nine hundred manufacturing firms employ more than one hundred twenty thousand employees and contribute over sixteen billion dollars annually to Colorado's economy; and

Both durable and consumable goods are manufactured in Colorado, including products such as medical instruments, semiconductors and other information technology products, plastics, aviation equipment components, chemicals, and food products requiring specialized processes.

The general assembly further finds that:

The promise and challenge of sustaining growth in Colorado's manufacturing sector presents special difficulties due to the scope and diversity of the industry;

Manufacturing sector employers have increased reliance on automated and computer-integrated control processes and "lean" manufacturing principles;

Workers in this employment environment need foundational knowledge, specialized skills, portable production skills, as well as flexibility and adaptability in work habits;

This has resulted in a shortfall in the quantity and quality of the pool of workers who can succeed in the manufacturing sector; and

Because manufacturing in Colorado is a dynamic and evolving economic engine for the state, the challenges in preparing a pipeline of skilled employees to work in the manufacturing sector must be addressed, and current and future Colorado workers must be aware of the opportunities in the industry and the career pathway to achieve employment in the manufacturing sector.

Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that developing a manufacturing career pathway for Colorado citizens will:

Increase the number of Colorado citizens accessing postsecondary education;

Increase the number of Colorado citizens completing degrees and other credentials;

Decrease the need for remediation at the postsecondary level;

Increase entry into employment and increase wages over time; and

Create better transitions in educational programs for students in the manufacturing career pathway from high school to college, from adult education to postsecondary credit, and from community colleges to four-year institutions of higher education or into employment.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1165), ch. 305, p. 1617, § 1, effective August 7.

23-60-1002. Definitions.

As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the state board for community colleges and occupational education created in section 23-60-104.

"Career pathway" means a series of connected education and training strategies and support services that enable individuals to secure industry-relevant skills and certification where applicable, and to obtain employment within an occupational area and to advance to higher levels of future education and employment.

"Manufacturing sector" means establishments, including existing and emerging manufacturing sector partnerships, engaged in the mechanical, physical, or chemical transformation of materials, substances, or components into new products. "Manufacturing sector" includes the employees who plan, manage, and perform the processing of materials into intermediate or final products and related professionals and technical support activities, including production planning and control, maintenance, and manufacturing process engineering.

"Manufacturing sector partnership" means a collaboration of business and industry, in partnership with public workforce development, economic development, and education partners, to ensure that workers are prepared to meet the growing demands of the manufacturing industry sector within a geographic area.

"Stackable certificates" means a sequence of credentials, each of which is recognized by employers and provides a gateway to employment and matriculation into a technical degree or advanced study in a field.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1165), ch. 305, p. 1618, § 1, effective August 7.

23-60-1003. Manufacturing career pathway - design.

No later than the 2014-15 academic year, the board, after consulting with local district colleges and area technical colleges, in collaboration with the department of labor and employment, the department of higher education, the department of education, and the state work force development council, created in section 24-46.3-101, C.R.S., shall design a career pathway for students within the manufacturing sector. The manufacturing career pathway shall connect school districts, local district colleges, area technical colleges, community colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education with adult education programs, local workforce development programs, and regional manufacturing sector partnerships, and will allow a student to earn income while progressing along the career pathway.

The manufacturing career pathway must include industry-validated stackable certifications and multiple entry and exit points that allow students of all ages to seek additional opportunities in the manufacturing sector. The manufacturing career pathway designed by the board must include, but need not be limited to, the following components:

Alignment with the skills and requirements that state and local manufacturing sector employers, through manufacturing sector partnerships, determine are necessary for career progression in high-demand occupations within the manufacturing sector;

A full range of middle school, secondary, adult education, and postsecondary education options, with a nonduplicative, clearly articulated course progression from one level of instruction to the next, with opportunities to earn postsecondary credits, maximize credit for prior learning, and secure industry-validated credentials;

Technical skill assessments at multiple points in the manufacturing career pathway that lead to industry certifications or other value in employment, including advanced placement into a higher level of training;

Academic and career counseling resources, best practices in wraparound support services, particularly at transition points along the manufacturing career pathway, and support and development of individual career and academic plans; and

Curriculum and instructional strategies that are appropriate for adult students and that embed learning and skill building in a work-related context.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1165), ch. 305, p. 1619, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 149, § 31, effective August 10.

23-60-1004. Online information - manufacturing career pathway.

After the design of the manufacturing career pathway is completed pursuant to section 23-60-1003, the department of higher education, in collaboration with the department of labor and employment, shall post information concerning the career pathway on the state-provided, free online career, education, and training resource created pursuant to section 24-46.3-106. The following information must be included:

Manufacturing sector career awareness;

Salary and wage information for manufacturing sector careers;

The manufacturing sector employment forecast;

Information on programs within the manufacturing career pathway, services provided, and financial aid opportunities for students; and

Online student support services.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1165), ch. 305, p. 1620, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended, (HB 20-1396), ch. 138, p. 601, § 8, effective September 14.